Arkansas, session 2025, HB1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 96, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Right to Repair

4-96-401. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Continue to enhance the ability of farmers to timely control
the lawful operation and upkeep of agricultural equipment;
(2) Assure the timely availability, on fair and reasonable
terms, of tools, specialty tools, software, and documentation originating
from a manufacturer and data from the operation of agricultural equipment
originating from a manufacturer;
(3) Assure that no safety controls or protocols on agricultural
equipment are compromised through the modification of protective measures
installed for the benefit of agricultural equipment owners, operators, and
bystanders;
(4) Assure that the intellectual property of a manufacturer,
*CRH264*
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
including copyrighted software, is fully protected from illegal infringement
through the modification of embedded software; and
(5) Assure that compliance with federal and state emissions
control requirements is not compromised through changes to power ratings or
other modification of control measures installed for the purpose of complying
with the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, and other environmental laws and regulations.

4-96-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Agricultural equipment" means a product primarily designed for use
in an agricultural operation and located in Arkansas.
(B) "Agricultural equipment" includes without limitation the following
pieces of equipment:
(i) A tractor;
(ii) A combine;
(iii) Harvesting equipment;
(iv) Tillage equipment;
(v) Planting, irrigation, or cultivating implements;
(vi) A baler; and
(vii) Other off-road vehicles primarily designed for
use in an agricultural operation.
(C) "Agricultural equipment" does not include:
(i) Motor vehicles designed and sold primarily for
passenger or property transportation on public roadways;
(ii) Motorcycles; or
(iii) Class 1 or Class 2 all-terrain vehicles;
(2) "Authorized repair facility" means an individual or business:
(A) That has an arrangement for a definite or indefinite
period with a manufacturer under which the manufacturer grants to the
individual or business a permission, license, or franchise to use a trade
name, service mark, or related characteristic for the purposes of offering
diagnosis, repair, or maintenance services of agricultural equipment under
the name of or on behalf of the manufacturer; or
(B) That is otherwise utilized by the manufacturer to
provide repair or maintenance services on agricultural equipment;
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
(3) "Code" means:
(A) Human or machine-readable information related to a
performance issue arising from the operation of a farmer's agricultural
equipment; or
(B) Information necessary to be transmitted to a farmer's
agricultural equipment to maintain, repair, or activate the agricultural
equipment or a part of the agricultural equipment;
(4) "Data" means transmitted or compiled information arising
from the operation of a farmer's agricultural equipment or parts of the
agricultural equipment;
(5) "Documentation" means a manual, diagram, reporting output,
service code description, schematic, or other guidance or information used in
affecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, repair, or upgrade of
agricultural equipment;
(6)(A) "Embedded software" means programmable instructions
provided on firmware delivered with or loaded to the agricultural equipment,
with respect to agricultural equipment operation, including all relevant
patches and fixes made by the manufacturer including without limitation:
(i) Basic internal operating system;
(ii) Internal operating system;
(iii) Machine code;
(iv) Assembly code;
(v) Root code; and
(vi) Microcode.
(B) "Embedded software" includes a software program or set
of instructions programmed on agricultural equipment or on a part of the
agricultural equipment to allow the agricultural equipment or part of the
agricultural equipment to communicate within the agricultural equipment or
with other computer hardware;
(7)(A) "Fair and reasonable" means equitable terms for access to
or receipt of an item pertaining to agricultural equipment, including any
tools, specialty tools, software, and documentation.
(B) "Fair and reasonable" includes a consideration of
relevant factors, including without limitation the manufacturer's suggested
retail price and the distribution model of a respective item;
(8) "Farmer" means:
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
(A) An individual or business engaged in agriculture as a
means of livelihood or commerce, including without limitation the production
of crops, livestock, or aquaculture, excluding recreational fishing; and
(B) That owns or leases agricultural equipment;
(9) "Independent repair facility" means an individual or
business that is not affiliated with an authorized repair facility or a
manufacturer with respect to agricultural equipment but is:
(A) Engaged in diagnosing, maintaining, or repairing
agricultural equipment generally; and
(B) Is willing and capable of repairing agricultural
equipment if provided access to tools, specialty tools, software, and
documentation regarding the agricultural equipment, whether or not the
individual or business is a farmer;
(10) "Manufacturer" means an entity engaged in the business of
selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new agricultural equipment
manufactured by or on behalf of the manufacturer to an individual or a
business;
(11) "Specialty tool" means a mechanical implement originating
from a manufacturer that is necessary for facilitation of mechanical or
electronic maintenance, repair, or upgrade of the manufacturer's agricultural
equipment that is not generally available other than from the manufacturer's
authorized repair facilities; and
(12)(A) "Tool" means software, a hardware implement, a specialty
hardware implement, or other apparatus originating from the manufacturer used
for data readout, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural
equipment.
(B) "Tool" includes without limitation software or other
mechanisms that calibrate functionality or perform any other function
required to operate, maintain, upgrade, activate, or bring the agricultural
equipment back to a fully functional condition.

4-96-403. Manufacturer obligations.
(a) A manufacturer shall ensure that a farmer, a farmer's staff
member, or an independent technician assisting a farmer at the farmer's
request, and an independent repair facility:
(1) Has electronic access on fair and reasonable terms to the
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
manufacturer's tools, specialty tools, software, and documentation, including
without limitation:
(A) Manuals related to operation, parts, and service;
(B) Product service demonstrations, training, seminars, or
clinics;
(C) On-board diagnostics via a diagnostics port or
wireless interface; and
(D) Other publications with information on operation,
parts, service, and safety;
(2) Has access to obtain, per subscription or sale,
manufacturer's tools, specialty tools, software, and documentation from the
manufacturer or from an authorized repair facility on fair and reasonable
terms;
(3) Has electronic access on fair and reasonable terms to
manufacturer's codes and data; and
(4) Makes available, with a farmer's authorization, codes and
data to the farmer's selected independent repair facility.
(b) This subchapter does not require a manufacturer to:
(1) Divulge trade secrets, proprietary information, or
confidential information;
(2) Allow owners or independent repair facilities to override
safety features or emissions controls or to adjust agricultural equipment
power levels; or
(3) Violate any federal, state, or local laws or regulations.

4-96-404. Provision to farmers on fair and reasonable basis.
(a)(1) If a manufacturer provides to an authorized repair facility a
tool, specialty tool, software, or documentation for functions listed in § 4-
96-403(a)(1) separately or as fully or partially integrated software, the
manufacturer shall ensure that the tool, specialty tool, software, and
documentation are available to a farmer on a fair and reasonable basis.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply whether the:
(A) Tool, as part of software or otherwise, or specialty
tool is purchased, leased, or subscribed to; or
(B) Fulfillment is made directly by the manufacturer or an
authorized repair facility.
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
(b) When a manufacturer receives a code or real-time data with respect
to the in-field operation of a farmer's agricultural equipment, the
manufacturer shall ensure that the code or data is also available to the
farmer using the agricultural equipment.
(c) Subject to the limitations of § 4-96-403(b), a manufacturer shall
make available on fair and reasonable terms to a farmer that owns or leases
agricultural equipment manufactured by or on behalf of the manufacturer the
tools, specialty tools, software, and documentation, inclusive of any updates
to information or embedded software, for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair
purposes of the agricultural equipment.
(d) For agricultural equipment that contains an electronic lock,
immobilizer, or other security-related function, subject to the limitations
of § 4-96-403(b), a manufacturer shall make available to the farmer on fair
and reasonable terms any special documentation and tools needed to:
(1) Disable the lock, immobilizer, or other security-related
function; and
(2) Reset the lock when disabled in the ordinary course of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural equipment.
(e) To the extent practicable and as a manufacturer deems secure,
subject to the limitations of § 4-96-403(b), tools, specialty tools,
software, and documentation shall be provided on a remote, immediate basis,
whether delivery is made from the manufacturer or through an authorized
repair facility.
(f) A manufacturer shall provide a farmer and an independent repair
facility with an opportunity on fair and reasonable terms to acquire any
software integrally with or within a tool or subsequently as necessary for
the operation, maintenance, repair, or upgrade of the agricultural equipment
or a mechanical part of the agricultural equipment.
(g) A manufacturer is not required to sell tools, specialty tools,
software, or documentation if the tools, specialty tools, software, or
documentation are no longer available to the manufacturer or the authorized
repair facility of the manufacturer.
(h)(1) A manufacturer shall not prevent a farmer or independent repair
facility from legally fabricating or otherwise obtaining tools, specialty
tools, software, or documentation from a third party, whether or not the
tools, specialty tools, software, or documentation are currently available
04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/3/25 HB1852
from the manufacturer or an authorized repair facility, for use solely in the
ordinary course of his or her own lawful businesses and not for resale or
distribution.
(2) Subdivision (h)(1) of this section does not prevent or
preclude a manufacturer from pursuing an action to enforce a trademark,
copyright, or other claim of infringement regarding the manufacturer's
intellectual property.
(i) If an independent repair facility requests that a manufacturer
provide any tools, specialty tools, software, or documentation as provided to
farmers under subsections (a)—(h) of this section, or if a farmer makes a
request in connection with his or her own agricultural equipment, the
manufacturer shall provide the tools, specialty tools, software, or
documentation on fair and reasonable terms with respect to the independent
repair facility.

/s/J. Moore




















04-03-2025 11:02:30 CRH264